Arkansas, session 2025, HB1330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. The purpose of this act is to amend the Arkansas Code
concerning certain committees of the General Assembly and to amend Arkansas
law pertaining to the Joint Committee on Energy and the Joint Interim
Committee on Energy.







*MBM118*
01/30/2025 10:02:40 AM MBM118